Maryland, session 2026, HB1568.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
1–1321.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ALL COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES.
(B) EACH COUNTY AND MUNICIPALITY SHALL ADOPT A LOCAL LAW:
(1) PROHIBITING THE OWNER OF A DOG FROM ALLOWING A DOG TO
BE AT LARGE;
(2) ESTABLISHING PROCEDURES FOR THE IMPOUNDMENT OF A DOG
FOUND AT LARGE BY AN ANIMAL CONTROL UNIT OR OTHER ENFORCEMENT ENTITY;
AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1568*

HOUSE BILL 1568
(3) ESTABLISHING PENALTIES FOR A VIOLATION, INCLUDING CIVIL
AND CRIMINAL PENALTIES.
(C) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PREEMPT A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT FROM ENACTING AND ENFORCING MORE STRINGENT MEASURES
THAN THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that this Act be applied and interpreted to recognize the definition of the term
“running at large” as used by the Appellate Court of Maryland in Blitzer v. Breski, 259 Md.
App. 257 (2023).
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.